Alabama, session 2026rs, HB346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Any entity that engages in any act or
practice that violates human trafficking laws as provided in
Sections 13A-6-152 and 13A-6-153, Code of Alabama 1975, or
federal child labor provisions of the Fair Labor Standards Act
of 1938 as provided in 29 U.S.C. § 212, shall reimburse to the
state and local government the cost of any economic
development incentive, including any tax abatement, grant, or
tax refund received by the entity pursuant to Title 40, Code
of Alabama 1975, from the date the entity is found guilty of
or liable for the violation.
Section 2. Sections 40-18-373 and 40-18-374, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§40-18-373
In order for a company to be an approved company, all
of the following shall occur:
(1) For any company that proposes a qualifying project,
the Secretary of Commerce shall make all of the following
findings:
a. That the The project is in fact a qualifying
Page 2

a. That the The project is in fact a qualifying
HB346 INTRODUCED
project;.
b. That the The qualifying project will not decrease,
directly or indirectly, Alabama's exports; and.
c. That the The amount of tax incentives sought are is
exceeded by anticipated revenues for the state, including
income, property, business privilege, utility, gross receipts,
sales, and use tax revenues that are generated by the economic
activity resulting from the project, as they arise from the
following aspects of the qualifying project:
1. Construction activities related to the qualifying
project;.
2. The purchase of building materials and the initial
equipping of the qualifying project;.
3. The subsequent equipping of the qualifying project;
and.
4. The operation of the qualifying project.
d. The company, any subsidiary of the company, or
company suppliers do not engage in any act or practice that
violates human trafficking laws as provided in Sections
13A-6-152 and 13A-6-153, or child labor provisions of the Fair
Labor Standards Act of 1938, provided in 29 U.S.C. § 212.
(2) Upon making affirmative findings on the criteria
set forth in subdivision (1) that are applicable, the
Secretary of Commerce shall recommend to the Governor that the
company be designated as an approved company. The name of the
company and information collected about it shall be forwarded
to the Governor.
(3) After reviewing the information provided by the
Page 3

(3) After reviewing the information provided by the
HB346 INTRODUCED
Secretary of Commerce, the Governor shall also determine
whether the company meets the criteria set forth outlined in
subdivision (1). If the Governor makes such a finding, the
company shall be an approved company."
"§40-18-374
(a) An incentivized company may claim either or both of
the jobs act incentives, to the extent provided in the project
agreement.
(b) In order for an incentivized company to claim the
jobs act incentives, the Governor and the incentivized company
shall execute a project agreement. The agreement shall contain
all of the following:
(1) The name of the incentivized company.
(2) The location of the qualifying project.
(3) The activity to be conducted at the qualifying
100 project.
101 (4) The jobs act incentives to be granted.
102 (5) The capital investment to be made at the qualifying
103 project.
104 (6) The time period for the capital investment to be
105 made at the qualifying project.
106 (7) The number of employees at the qualifying project.
107 (8) The anticipated wages to be paid to or for the
108 benefit of employees during the incentive period for the jobs
109 created.
110 (9) The dates or conditions that shall begin the
111 running of the incentive periods for applicable jobs act
112 incentives.
Page 4

incentives.
HB346 INTRODUCED
113 (10) The lengths of the incentive periods for the jobs
114 act incentives.
115 (11) Any annual or aggregate limitations on the amount
116 of either or both of the jobs act incentives that can be
117 claimed during an incentive period.
118 (12) Provisions governing the recapture of all or part
119 of the jobs act incentives awarded to the qualifying project,
120 should the approved company default on its obligations in the
121 project agreement.
122 (13) Provisions governing the recapture of all or part
123 of tax incentives awarded to the qualifying project if the
124 approved company, any subsidiary of the company, or supplier
125 of the company engages in any act or practice that violates
126 human trafficking laws as provided in Sections 13A-6-152 and
127 13A-6-153 or federal child labor provisions of the Fair Labor
128 Standards Act of 1938 as provided in 29 U.S.C § 212.
129 (13)(14) Whether the project agreement may be assigned
130 by the approved company the approved company may assign the
131 project agreement to some other purchaser, assignee, or
132 successor.
133 (14)(15) Any other terms, conditions, and limitations
134 that this article or the Governor may require for an
135 incentivized company to qualify for and receive a jobs act
136 incentive.
137 (15)(16) Any other terms the parties deem necessary or
138 desirable.
139 (c) The Governor may decrease the amounts and durations
140 duration of the jobs act incentives to ensure that the
Page 5

duration of the jobs act incentives to ensure that the
HB346 INTRODUCED
141 anticipated revenues for the state will exceed the amount of
142 tax incentives sought."
143 Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
144 2026.
Page 6